Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.805

Foreign trade zones—Authority to apply for permission to establish, operate and maintain.

A city or town, as zone sponsor, may apply to the United States for permission to establish, operate, and maintain foreign trade zones: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent these zones from being operated and financed by a private corporation(s) on behalf of a city or town acting as zone sponsor.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 24.46.010.